Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-1228
Interstate simulcast facility license; application.

Any racetrack issued a license under sections 2-1201 to 2-1223 (1) conducting primarily quarterhorse races in the year immediately preceding the year for which application is made or (2) conducting primarily thoroughbred horseraces in the year immediately preceding the year for which application is made may apply to the commission for an interstate simulcast facility license. An application for such license shall be in a form prescribed by the commission and shall contain such information, material, or evidence as the commission may require. Any racetrack issued an interstate simulcast facility license may conduct the interstate simulcast of any horserace permitted under its license, and parimutuel wagering shall be allowed on such horserace.

Laws 1989, LB 591, § 7;

Laws 1993, LB 471, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB1001, § 8.
July 1, 2026